src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
!! Nouns
! -----
!! 
!! Nouns in Somali have separate paradigms depending on
!! morphophonological stuff, but are split up into subgroups which correspond
!! to gender polarity groups.

!! Note that items containing ATR should mark the ATR using <¨> before the vowel
!! or at the beginning of the stem if uncertain.

!! {{{
!! doog:¨doog NOUN1_M/SgOnly ;
!! }}}

LEXICON Nouns
D1 ;
D2 ;
D3 ;
D4 ;
D5 ;
D6 ;
D7 ;
ArabicLoans ;
IrregNouns ;

!! !! Irregular nouns
!! _il_ and _si_ are both female in singular, and have typical morphology there
!! but, have varying irregular masculine plural forms.

LEXICON IrregNouns !!= * @CODE@ 
il NOUN1_F/SgOnly ;
si NOUN1_F/SgOnly ;
wax FINAL ;
IrregularNounMorph ;

! Test data:
!!€gt-desc: il # Irregular tests
!!€ il: il+N+Fem+Sg+Indef+Abs
!!€ isha: il+N+Fem+Sg+Def+Abs+Prox
!!€ indho: il+N+Masc+Pl+Indef+Abs
!!€ indhaha: il+N+Masc+Pl+Def+Abs+Prox

!!€gt-desc: il # Irregular tests
!!€ si: si+N+Fem+Sg+Indef+Abs
!!€ sida: si+N+Fem+Sg+Def+Abs+Prox
!!€ siyaabo: si+N+Masc+Pl+Indef+Abs
!!€ siyaabaha: si+N+Masc+Pl+Def+Abs+Prox

LEXICON D1
D1_F ;
D1_F/SgOnly ;
D1_M ;
D1_M/PlOnly ;
D1_M/SgOnly ;

!! !! Declension 1: F→M

!! TODO: write quick overview of morphosyntax, morphophon
!! -i for some nominatives. Pl is -o.

!! Good amount of nouns with -ad, Fem derivational suffix.

!!€gt-desc: aalad # aalad sample paradigm.
!!€ aalad: aalad+N+Decl/1+Fem+Sg+Indef+Abs
!!€ aaladda: aalad+N+Decl/1+Fem+Sg+Def+Abs+Prox
!!€ aalado: aalad+N+Decl/1+Masc+Pl+Indef+Abs
!!€ aaladaha: aalad+N+Decl/1+Masc+Pl+Def+Abs+Prox


LEXICON D1_M/PlOnly
xoolo:xool NOUN1_M/PlOnly ;

!! !! Declension 1: Fem. Sg. Only

!! A fair amount of abstract things, and some collective things that probably need
!! to be moved to collective lexica.

LEXICON D2
Collective ;
D2_F ;
D2_M ;
D2_M_Coll ;
D2_M_Mass ;
D2_M_yo ;
D2_M_Arabic ;

!! !! Declension 2: Collective

!! Groups of things, -ley is a common suffix. Taged with +Coll, but available
!! only in singular.

LEXICON D2_M_Arabic
masaajid NOUN2_M ;
surwaal NOUN2_M ;

!! !! Declension 2: F→F
!!
!! -yo plurals

LEXICON D2_F
qor NOUN2_F ;
quraac NOUN2_F ;
sabti NOUN2_F ;
subax NOUN2_F ;
subax:subax NOUN2_F ;

!! !! Declension 2: M→F - collectives

!! TODO: these are collectives, but not marked as such and perhaps should be.
!! but also, they have plurals. May be marked as collectives because of Orwin

LEXICON D2_M_Coll
canab NOUN2_M ;
dumar NOUN2_M ;
kalluun:kalluu{m} NOUN2_M ;
raashin NOUN2_M ;
reer NOUN2_M ;

!! !! Declension 2: M→F - Mass

!! TODO: these are mass nouns, but not marked as such and perhaps should be.
!! Plurals found in word lists, so maybe these need some special handling.

LEXICON D2_M_Mass
baraf NOUN2_M ;
bariis NOUN2_M ;
ilaah NOUN2_M ;
shaah NOUN2_M ;
subag NOUN2_M ;

!! !! Declension 3: M→M
!!
!! These are fun, because plurals delete the second vowel.
!! Ex.) gabadh -> gabdho; xubin -> xubno
!!
!! Note that some of these have lenis/fortis changes:
!! Ex.) xadhig -> xadhko
!! 

LEXICON D3
D3_M ;
D3_F ;

!! !! Declension 3: F→M

! Test data:
!!€gt-desc: gabadh # dh + d -> dh; vowel deletion
!!€ gabadh: gabadh+N+Fem+Sg+Indef+Abs
!!€ gabadha: gabadh+N+Fem+Sg+Def+Abs+Prox
!!€ gabdho: gabadh+N+Masc+Pl+Indef+Abs
!!€ gabdhaha: gabadh+N+Masc+Pl+Def+Abs+Prox

LEXICON D3_F
gabadh:gab^adh NOUN3_F ;
gacan:gac^a{m} NOUN3_F ;
galab:gal^ab NOUN3_F ;
kibis:kib^is NOUN3_F ;
maalin:maal^i{m} NOUN3_F ;
xubin:xub^in NOUN3_F ;

!! !! Declension 3: M→M

!!€gt-desc: xadhig # g ~ k; vowel deletion
!!€ xadhig: xadhig+N+Masc+Sg+Indef+Abs
!!€ xadhigga: xadhig+N+Masc+Sg+Def+Abs+Prox
!!€ xadhko: xadhig+N+Masc+Pl+Indef+Abs
!!€ xadhkaha: xadhig+N+Masc+Pl+Def+Abs+Prox

LEXICON D3_M
garab:gar^ab NOUN3_M ;
hilib:hil^ib NOUN3_M ;
ilig:il^ik NOUN3_M ;
jilib:jil^ib NOUN3_M ;
qalab:qal^ab NOUN3_M ;
qalin:qal^i{m} NOUN3_M ;
waran:war^a{m} NOUN3_M ;
xadhig:xadh^ik NOUN3_M ;

! TODO: continue documenting here

LEXICON D4
D4_F ;
D4_M ;
D4_UGAX ;

LEXICON D4_UGAX
dhagax:dhag NOUN4_UGAX ;
qodax:qod NOUN4_UGAX ;
ugax:ug NOUN4_UGAX ;

LEXICON D4_F
baal NOUN4_MF ;
ceel NOUN4_MF ;
dul NOUN4_FM ;
goob NOUN4_FM ;
hor NOUN4_FM ;
qoor NOUN4_FM ;
seef NOUN4_FM ;
weel NOUN4_MF ;
wiil NOUN4_MF ;

LEXICON D5
D5_M ;

LEXICON D5_M
arday NOUN5_M ;
arday:ardey NOUN5_M ;
awr NOUN5_M ;
caday NOUN5_M ;
carab NOUN5_M ;
dameer NOUN5_M ;
ey NOUN5_M ;
haad NOUN5_M ;
madax NOUN5_M ;

LEXICON D6
D6_F ;
D6_M ;

LEXICON D6_M
daymo:dayma NOUN6_M ;
dhismo:dhisma NOUN6_M ;
gudo:guda NOUN6_M ;
malo:mala NOUN6_M ;
moxoggo:moxogga NOUN6_M ;
qasaaro:qasaara NOUN6_M ;
xiiso:xiisa NOUN6_M ;
janno:janna NOUN6_M ;
barkimo:barkima NOUN6_M ;

LEXICON D7
D7_M ;
